Washington statutes.
RCW 9.38.020

False representation concerning title.

Every person who shall maliciously or fraudulently execute or file for record any instrument, or put forward any claim, by which the right or title of another to any real or personal property is, or purports to be transferred, encumbered or clouded, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[2000 c 250 s 9A-821; 1909 c 249 s 369; RRS s 2621.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 250: See RCW 62A.9A-701.